Massachusetts, session 194th, H2290.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following section:-
Section 18. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a municipality
may petition the executive office of housing and livable communities for an exemption from
compliance with a state-imposed housing mandate, including but not limited to section 3A of this
chapter. The petition shall include evidence demonstrating that compliance would: (a) impose an
undue financial or administrative burden; (b) exceed the municipality's capacity for housing,
infrastructure, or services; or (c) conflict with existing local priorities or zoning regulations.
The department of housing and community development shall promulgate regulations for
reviewing and approving such petitions, including timelines and criteria for exemptions.
of 1